Hawaii statutes.
[§489M-4 Prior agreements.] Any
international trade agreement entered into by the President of the United
States, which contains provisions relating in any manner to procurement by the
states to which the governor has agreed prior to July 10, 2007, shall remain
valid. [L Sp 2007, c 1, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"July 10, 2007" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next